apertium-sh-mk/apertium-sh-mk.mk.dix.xml
   <pardef n="personal_pronouns__enc">
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>ме</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>те</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>го</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>ја</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>го</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>ни</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>ве</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>ги</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>ми</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>ти</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>му</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>и</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>му</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>ни</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>ви</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>им</l>
         <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
   </pardef>

   <pardef n="/тој__prn">
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>тој</l>
         <r>тој<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>овој</l>
         <r>тој<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="prx"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>оној</l>
         <r>тој<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="dst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>таа</l>
         <r>тој<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>оваа</l>
         <r>тој<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="prx"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>онаа</l>
         <r>тој<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="dst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>тоа</l>
         <r>тој<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>ова</l>
         <r>тој<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="prx"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>она</l>
         <r>тој<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="dst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>

     <e>
       <p>
         <l>оние</l>
         <r>тој<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
   </pardef>


   <pardef n="што__prn">
     <e>
       <p>
         <l/>
         <r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
   </pardef>

   <pardef n="ко/ј__prn">
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>ј</l>
         <r>ј<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>го</l>
         <r>ј<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>му</l>
         <r>ј<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
   </pardef>

   <!-- Именки -->
   <pardef n="молив__n"> 
     <e>
       <p>
         <l/>
         <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__m_sg_def"/>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>и</l>
         <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__mf_pl_def"/>
     </e>
   </pardef>

   <pardef n="маж__n"> 
     <e>
       <p>
         <l/>
         <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__m_sg_def"/>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>и</l>
         <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__mf_pl_def"/>
     </e>
   </pardef>

   <pardef n="/човек__n"> 
  <e>
    <p>
       <l>човек</l>
       <r>човек<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
     </p>
  </e>
   <e>
     <p>
       <l>луѓе</l>
       <r>човек<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
  </pardef>

   <pardef n="снег__n"> 
     <e>
       <p>
         <l/>
         <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__m_sg_def"/>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>ови</l>
         <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__mf_pl_def"/>
     </e>
   </pardef>

   <pardef n="речни/к__n">
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>к</l>
         <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__m_sg_def"/>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>ци</l>
         <r>к<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__mf_pl_def"/>
     </e>
   </pardef>

   <pardef n="бро/ј__n">
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>ј</l>
         <r>ј<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__m_sg_def"/>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>еви</l>
         <r>ј<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__mf_pl_def"/>
     </e>
   </pardef>

   <pardef n="албан/ец__n">
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>ец</l>
         <r>ец<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__m_sg_def"/>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>ци</l>
         <r>ец<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__mf_pl_def"/>
     </e>
   </pardef>


   <pardef n="колег/а__n">
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>а</l>
         <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__m_sg_def"/>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>и</l>
         <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__mf_pl_def"/>
     </e>
   </pardef>

   <pardef n="жен/а__n">
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>а</l>
         <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__f_sg_def"/>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>и</l>
         <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__mf_pl_def"/>
     </e>
   </pardef>

   <pardef n="извешта/ј__n">
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>ј</l>
         <r>ј<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__f_sg_def"/>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>и</l>
         <r>и<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__mf_pl_def"/>
     </e>
   </pardef>

   <pardef n="суди/ја__n">
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>ја</l>
         <r>ја<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__f_sg_def"/>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>и</l>
         <r>ја<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__mf_pl_def"/>
     </e>
   </pardef>

   <e lm="clitic personal pronouns"><i/><par n="personal_pronouns__enc"/></e>
   <e lm="кој"><i>ко</i><par n="ко/ј__prn"/></e>
   <e lm="што"><i>што</i><par n="што__prn"/></e>
   <e lm="тој"><i/><par n="/тој__prn"/></e>
   <e lm="албанец"><i>албан</i><par n="албан/ец__n"/></e>
   <e lm="остров"><i>остров</i><par n="молив__n"/></e>
   <e lm="автор"><i>автор</i><par n="молив__n"/></e>
   <e lm="гледач"><i>гледач</i><par n="молив__n"/></e>
   <e lm="долар"><i>долар</i><par n="молив__n"/></e>
   <e lm="играч"><i>играч</i><par n="молив__n"/></e>
   <e lm="кабинет"><i>кабинет</i><par n="молив__n"/></e>
   <e lm="мандат"><i>мандат</i><par n="молив__n"/></e>
   <e lm="обид"><i>обид</i><par n="молив__n"/></e>
   <e lm="повод"><i>повод</i><par n="молив__n"/></e>
   <e lm="приход"><i>приход</i><par n="молив__n"/></e>
   <e lm="секретар"><i>секретар</i><par n="молив__n"/></e>
   <e lm="транспорт"><i>транспорт</i><par n="молив__n"/></e>
   <e lm="чекор"><i>чекор</i><par n="молив__n"/></e>
   <e lm="костен"><i>костен</i><par n="молив__n"/></e>
   <e lm="ѓердан"><i>ѓердан</i><par n="молив__n"/></e>
   <e lm="роман"><i>роман</i><par n="молив__n"/></e>
   <e lm="маж"><i>маж</i><par n="маж__n"/></e>
   <e lm="блок"><i>блок</i><par n="снег__n"/></e>
   <e lm="меч"><i>меч</i><par n="снег__n"/></e>
   <e lm="мир"><i>мир</i><par n="снег__n"/></e>
   <e lm="ред"><i>ред</i><par n="снег__n"/></e>
   <e lm="син"><i>син</i><par n="снег__n"/></e>
   <e lm="спорт"><i>спорт</i><par n="снег__n"/></e>
   <e lm="став"><i>став</i><par n="снег__n"/></e>
   <e lm="старт"><i>старт</i><par n="снег__n"/></e>
   <e lm="страв"><i>страв</i><par n="снег__n"/></e>
   <e lm="текст"><i>текст</i><par n="снег__n"/></e>
   <e lm="тип"><i>тип</i><par n="снег__n"/></e>
   <e lm="штаб"><i>штаб</i><par n="снег__n"/></e>
   <e lm="фонд"><i>фонд</i><par n="снег__n"/></e>
   <e lm="час"><i>час</i><par n="снег__n"/></e>
   <e lm="труд"><i>труд</i><par n="снег__n"/></e>
   <e lm="фан"><i>фан</i><par n="снег__n"/></e>
   <e lm="божик"><i>божик</i><par n="речни/к__n"/></e>
   <e lm="врисок"><i>врисо</i><par n="речни/к__n"/></e>
   <e lm="деловник"><i>деловни</i><par n="речни/к__n"/></e>
   <e lm="електрик"><i>електри</i><par n="речни/к__n"/></e>
   <e lm="заштитник"><i>заштитни</i><par n="речни/к__n"/></e>
   <e lm="класик"><i>класи</i><par n="речни/к__n"/></e>
   <e lm="месечник"><i>месечни</i><par n="речни/к__n"/></e>
   <e lm="научник"><i>научни</i><par n="речни/к__n"/></e>
   <e lm="отпечаток"><i>отпечато</i><par n="речни/к__n"/></e>
   <e lm="податок"><i>подато</i><par n="речни/к__n"/></e>
   <e lm="потсетник"><i>потсетни</i><par n="речни/к__n"/></e>
   <e lm="преставник"><i>преставни</i><par n="речни/к__n"/></e>
   <e lm="рудник"><i>рудни</i><par n="речни/к__n"/></e>
   <e lm="трошок"><i>трошок</i><par n="речни/к__n"/></e>
   <e lm="елек"><i>еле</i><par n="речни/к__n"/></e>
   <e lm="број"><i>бро</i><par n="бро/ј__n"/></e>
   <e lm="извештај"><i>извешта</i><par n="извешта/ј__n"/></e>
   <e lm="музеј"><i>музе</i><par n="извешта/ј__n"/></e>
   <e lm="случај"><i>случа</i><par n="извешта/ј__n"/></e>
   <e lm="сообраќај"><i>сообраќа</i><par n="извешта/ј__n"/></e>
   <e lm="развој"><i>разво</i><par n="извешта/ј__n"/></e>
   <e lm="колега"><i>колег</i><par n="колег/а__n"/></e>
   <e lm="книга"><i>книг</i><par n="жен/а__n"/></e>
   <e lm="улога"><i>улог</i><par n="жен/а__n"/></e>
   <e lm="плажа"><i>плаж</i><par n="жен/а__n"/></e>
   <e lm="цигара"><i>цигар</i><par n="жен/а__n"/></e>
   <e lm="жена"><i>жен</i><par n="жен/а__n"/></e>
   <e lm="книжарница"><i>книжарниц</i><par n="жен/а__n"/></e>
   <e lm="година"><i>годин</i><par n="жен/а__n"/></e>
   <e lm="група"><i>груп</i><par n="жен/а__n"/></e>
   <e lm="година"><i>годин</i><par n="жен/а__n"/></e>
   <e lm="држава"><i>држав</i><par n="жен/а__n"/></e>
   <e lm="влада"><i>влад</i><par n="жен/а__n"/></e>
   <e lm="изјава"><i>изјав</i><par n="жен/а__n"/></e>
   <e lm="карта"><i>карт</i><par n="жен/а__n"/></e>
   <e lm="средба"><i>средб</i><par n="жен/а__n"/></e>
   <e lm="точка"><i>точк</i><par n="жен/а__n"/></e>
   <e lm="судија"><i>суди</i><par n="суди/ја__n"/></e>
